Utah statutes.
10-7-33.   Delinquent taxes -- Installment payments -- Election and waiver.
It shall be competent for the governing body, upon the written application of
any company owning any such railway, to provide that such special taxes shall
become delinquent and be payable in installments as in case of taxes levied
upon abutting real estate as herein provided, but such application shall be
taken and deemed a waiver of any and all objections to such taxes and the
validity thereof. Such application shall be made at or before the final levy
of such taxes.
